Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-116
Residence service, defined.

Residence service means telecommunications service which is furnished to a dwelling and which is used for personal or domestic purposes and not for business, professional, or institutional purposes.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 17.